Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Chapter 27. Disclosure of Use of Nonoriginal Replacement Parts

§ 63-27-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Aftermarket crash part” means a replacement for any of the nonmechanical sheet metal or plastic parts which generally constitute the exterior of a motor vehicle, including inner and outer panels.

“Installer” means an individual who performs the work of replacing or repairing parts of a motor vehicle.

“Insurer” includes an insurance company and any person authorized to represent the insurer with respect to a claim and who is acting within the scope of the person’s authority.

“Nonoriginal equipment manufacturer aftermarket crash part” means an aftermarket crash part made by any manufacturer other than the original vehicle manufacturer or his supplier.

“Repair facility” means a motor vehicle dealer, garage, body shop or other commercial entity which undertakes the repair or replacement of those parts that generally constitute the exterior of a motor vehicle.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch 330, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 63-27-3.
Identification of manufacturer on part.

Any nonoriginal equipment manufacturer aftermarket crash part manufactured or supplied for use in this state on or after January 1, 1991, shall have affixed thereto or inscribed thereon the logo, identification number, or name of its manufacturer. Such manufacturer’s logo, identification number or name shall be visible after installation whenever practicable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 330, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 63-27-5.
Disclosure of use of nonoriginal replacement parts in repair estimate.

In all instances where nonoriginal equipment manufacturer aftermarket crash parts are used in preparing an estimate for repairs, the written estimate prepared by the insurer and repair facility shall clearly identify each such part. A disclosure document attached to the estimate shall contain the following information in no smaller than ten-point type:

THIS ESTIMATE HAS BEEN PREPARED BASED ON THE USE OF AFTERMARKET CRASH PARTS SUPPLIED BY A SOURCE OTHER THAN THE MANUFACTURER OF YOUR MOTOR VEHICLE. THE AFTERMARKET CRASH PARTS USED IN THE PREPARATION OF THIS ESTIMATE ARE WARRANTED BY THE MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR OF SUCH PARTS RATHER THAN THE MANUFACTURER OF YOUR VEHICLE.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 330, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 63-27-7.
Construction of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any part of this chapter is declared invalid or unconstitutional, such declaration shall not affect the part which remains.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 330, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1990.